New Jersey, session 222, S4376.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of State shall establish a program to provide grants to local government units and qualifying tax exempt not for profit entities to support the preservation, extension, and management of Revolutionary War Battlefields, encampments, and skirmish sites in New Jersey that are endangered due to development. b.  In establishing the grant program pursuant to this section, the department shall: (1)  develop guidelines and procedures for submission of grant applications, and criteria for the evaluation of such applications; (2)  establish terms and conditions for the awarding of a grant under this section, and monitor grant recipients compliance with the terms and conditions; and (3)  require the recipient of a grant to report to the department information relating to its use of grant funds under the program. c.  Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis based upon the following criteria: (1)  submission of specific plans and objectives for the preservation, expansion, or management of the Revolutionary War Battlefield, encampment, or skirmish site, including a statement of public benefit and the need for the work proposed; and (2)  demonstration by the applicant of administrative capabilities to carry out the proposed plans required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. d.  (1)  Within 90 days after the date of the enactment of this act, and not withstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the Department of State shall adopt, immediately upon filing proper notice with the Office of Administrative Law, the rules and regulations prepared by the department necessary to establish and implement the grant program. (2)  The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be in effect for a period not to exceed one year after the date of the filing.  These rules and regulations shall thereafter be adopted, amended, or readopted by the Department of State in accordance with the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 2.  There is appropriated $50,000,000 from the General Fund to the Department of State to implement the provisions of section 1 of P.L.  , c. (C.  ) (pending before the Legislature as this act). 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.